Utah statutes.
77-30-9.   Authority of officers under warrant of arrest.

Every such peace officer or other person empowered to make the arrest shall have the same authority in arresting the accused, to command assistance therein, as peace officers have by law in the execution of any criminal process directed to them, with like penalties against those who refuse their assistance.



Enacted by Chapter 15, 1980 General Session

